Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.110

Applications.

Applications for credentialing shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation which reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for credentialing provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the application.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 311; 1987 c 150 s 71.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.